Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1,150
Acceptance of act of Congress applicable to district.

Any irrigation or drainage district organized under the laws of Nebraska is hereby authorized to accept of the provisions of any Act of Congress of the United States applicable to such district and to obligate itself to comply with such laws, rules, and regulations as may be promulgated by any department of the United States in pursuance of such acts. Irrigation or drainage districts contracting with the United States under the provisions of sections 46-1,149 and 46-1,150 shall be governed in all matters by the laws of the state relating to irrigation or drainage districts as the case may be, except in such things as may be otherwise provided for such districts.

Laws 1915, c. 207, § 2, p. 461;

C.S.1922, § 2950;

C.S.1929, § 46-207;

R.S.1943, § 46-1,150.